Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Article III Regulation of Manufacturing, Distributing, Prescribing, Administering, and Dispensing Controlled Substances
21-28-3.20.
Authority of practitioner to prescribe, administer, and dispense.

A practitioner, in good faith and in the course of his or her professional practice only, may prescribe, administer, and dispense controlled substances, or he or she may cause the controlled substances to be administered by a nurse or intern under his or her direction and supervision.

When issuing an initial prescription for an opiate to an adult patient, a practitioner shall not exceed the maximum daily dose requirements established by the department of health.

Except as provided in subsection (a)(4) of this section, a practitioner shall not issue an opiate prescription to a minor for more than twenty (20) doses at any time. Prior to issuing an opiate prescription to a minor, a practitioner shall discuss with the parent or guardian of the minor the risks associated with opiate use and the reasons why the prescription is necessary. The practitioner shall document his or her discussion with the parent or guardian in the medical record.

Notwithstanding the limitations referenced in subsection (a)(3) of this section, if, in the professional medical judgment of a practitioner, a greater dosage or supply of an opiate is required to treat the minor patient’s acute medical condition or is necessary for the treatment of chronic pain management, sickle cell related pain, intractable pain treatment as defined in chapter 37.4 of title 5, pain associated with a cancer diagnosis, or for palliative care, then the practitioner may issue a prescription for the quantity needed to treat the acute medical condition, chronic pain, sickle cell related pain, intractable pain, pain associated with a cancer diagnosis, or pain experienced while the patient is in palliative care, provided that this dosage shall not exceed the maximum daily dosage permitted for the treatment of this pain as set forth in the department of health regulations. The condition triggering the prescription of an opiate shall be documented in the minor patient’s medical record, and the practitioner shall indicate that a non-opiate alternative was not appropriate to address the medical condition.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)(2) and (a)(3) of this section, this section shall not apply to medications designed for the treatment of substance abuse or opioid dependence.

The prescription-monitoring program shall be reviewed prior to starting any opioid. A prescribing practitioner, or designee as authorized by §

21-28-3.32(a)(3)

, shall review the prescription-monitoring program prior to refilling or initiating opioid therapy with an intrathecal pump. For patients the prescribing practitioner is maintaining on continuous opioid therapy for pain for three (3) months or longer, the prescribing practitioner shall review information from the prescription-monitoring program at least every three (3) months. Documentation of that review shall be noted in the patient’s medical record.

The director of health shall develop regulations for prescribing practitioners on appropriate limits of opioid use in acute pain management. Initial prescriptions of opioids for acute pain management of outpatient adults shall not exceed thirty (30) morphine milligram equivalents (MMEs) total daily dose per day for a maximum total of twenty (20) doses, and, for pediatric patients, the appropriate opioid dosage maximum per the department of health.

For the purposes of this section, acute pain management shall not include chronic pain management, pain associated with a cancer diagnosis, palliative or nursing home care, intractable or chronic intractable pain, as provided in §

5-37.4-2

, or other exception in accordance with department of health regulations.

Subsection (c) shall not apply to medications designed for the treatment of substance abuse or opioid dependence.

On or before September 1, 2018, the director of health shall develop, and make available to healthcare practitioners, information on best practices for co-prescribing opioid antagonists to patients. The best practices information shall identify situations in which co-prescribing an opioid antagonist may be appropriate, including, but not limited to:

In conjunction with a prescription for an opioid medication, under circumstances in which the healthcare practitioner determines the patient is at an elevated risk for an opioid drug overdose;

In conjunction with medications prescribed pursuant to a course of medication therapy management for the treatment of a substance use disorder involving opioids; or

Under any other circumstances in which a healthcare practitioner identifies a patient as being at an elevated risk for an opioid drug overdose.

The best practices information developed pursuant to subsection (f) of this section shall include guidelines for determining when a patient is at an elevated risk for an opioid drug overdose, including, but not limited to, situations in which the patient:

Meets the criteria provided in the opioid overdose toolkit published by the federal substance abuse and mental health service administration;

Is receiving high-dose, extended-release, or long-acting opioid medications;

Has a documented history of an alcohol or substance use disorder, or a mental health disorder;

Has a respiratory ailment or other co-morbidity that may be exacerbated by the use of opioid medications;

Has a known history of intravenous drug use or misuse of prescription opioids;

Has received emergency medical care or been hospitalized for an opioid overdose; or

Uses opioids with antidepressants, benzodiazepines, alcohol, or other drugs.

On or before September 1, 2018, the director of health and the secretary of the executive office of health and human services shall develop strategies that include:

Allowing practitioners in non-pharmacy settings to prescribe and dispense opioid antagonists; and

Ensuring that opioid antagonists that are distributed in a non-pharmacy setting are eligible for reimbursement from any health insurance carrier, as defined under chapters 18, 19, 20, and 41 of title 27, and the Rhode Island medical assistance program, as defined under chapter 7.2 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 434, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 43; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 43; P.L. 2005, ch. 93, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 277, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 37, § 2, effective June 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 38, § 2, effective June 2, 2021.

21-28-3.20.1.
Authority of practitioner to prescribe, administer, and dispense — Cancer, palliative care and chronic intractable pain.

A practitioner, in good faith and in the course of his or her professional practice managing pain associated with a cancer diagnosis, palliative or nursing home care, intractable or chronic intractable pain as provided in §

5-37.4-2

, or other condition allowed by department of health regulations pursuant to the exception in §

21-28-3.20(d)

, may prescribe, administer, and dispense controlled substances without regard to the 2016 CDC Guideline for Prescribing Opioids for Chronic Pain.

The director of health may promulgate those rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section and ensure that rules governing pain management associated with a cancer diagnosis, palliative or nursing home care, intractable or chronic intractable pain as provided in §

5-37.4-2

, or other condition allowed by department of health regulations pursuant to the exception created in §

21-28-3.20(d)

, shall:

Take into consideration the individualized needs of patients covered by this section; and

Make provisions for practitioners, acting in good faith, and in the course of their profession, and managing pain associated with their patients’ illness to use their best judgment notwithstanding any statute, rule, or regulation to the contrary.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 37, § 3, effective June 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 38, § 3, effective June 2, 2021.

21-28-3.21.
Operation of treatment and rehabilitation programs for drug dependent persons.

The administering or dispensing directly, but not prescribing, of any controlled substance listed in any schedule to a drug dependent person for the purpose of continuing his or her dependence upon the drugs in the course of conducting an authorized clinical investigation in the development of a treatment and rehabilitation program for drug dependent persons shall be deemed to be within the meaning of the term “in the course of professional practice,” provided that:

Approval is obtained prior to the initiation of the program by submission of an application for approval to proper federal authorities; and

A license to operate the program within the state is obtained from the director of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.22.
Administration, dispensation or use restricted to scope of employment or duty.

A person in charge of a hospital or a laboratory, or in the employ of this state, or of any other state, or of any political subdivision of a state, or a master of a ship or a person in charge of any aircraft upon which no physician is regularly employed, or a physician or surgeon duly licensed in some state, territory, or the District of Columbia to practice his or her profession, or a retired commissioned medical officer of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, or public health service employed upon that ship or aircraft who obtains controlled substances whether under the provisions of this chapter or otherwise, shall not administer nor dispense, nor use those controlled substances within this state, except within the scope of his or her employment or official duty, and then only for scientific or medical purposes and subject to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.23.
Advertising controlled substances.

No practitioner, manufacturer, or wholesaler shall solicit by public advertisement or otherwise application to him or her for prescription for, or sales of, controlled substances, or shall publicly advertise any treatment the principal element of which consists in the administering, dispensing, furnishing, giving away, or delivering of a controlled substance, except, that the manufacturer or wholesaler may advertise in journals and publications or by other means intended for circulation among the medical profession and drug trade generally.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.24.
Examination before use of controlled substances.

No physician, dentist, osteopath, chiropodist, or veterinarian shall administer, dispense, or prescribe any controlled substance in schedules II, III, and IV, except after an original physical examination of the person for whom, or the animal for which the controlled substance is intended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.25.
Subpoena powers.

The director of health shall have power to administer oaths, summon and examine witnesses, and order the production and examination of books, accounts, papers, records, and documents in any proceedings within the jurisdiction of the department. All subpoenas, and orders for the production of books, accounts, papers, records, and documents shall be signed and issued by the director of health and served as subpoenas in civil cases in the superior court are now served, or in lieu of that service served by an officer, agent, or representative designated by the director of health. If the person subpoenaed before the director of health fails to obey the command of the subpoena without reasonable cause, or if a person in attendance before the director of health shall, without reasonable cause, refuse to be sworn, or to be examined, or to answer a legal or pertinent question, or if any person shall fail to produce the books, accounts, papers, records, and documents material to the issue, set forth in an order duly served on him or her, the director of health may apply to any justice of the superior court of any county, upon proof of affidavit of the fact, for a rule or order returnable in not less than two (2) nor more than five (5) days, directing that person to show cause before the justice who made the order to any other justice why he or she should not be adjudged in contempt. Upon the return of the order the justice before whom the matter is brought on for a hearing shall examine under oath that person, and that person shall be given an opportunity to be heard, and if the justice shall determine that the person has refused without reasonable cause or legal excuse to be examined or to answer a legal and pertinent question, or to produce books, accounts, papers, records, and documents, material to the issue which he or she was ordered to bring or produce, he or she may immediately commit the offender to jail, there to remain until the offender submits to do the act which he or she was required to do, or is discharged according to law; provided, that no person testifying shall be exempt from prosecution or punishment for any perjury committed by him or her in his or her testimony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.26.
Labeling by manufacturers and wholesalers.

Whenever a manufacturer sells a controlled substance in packages designed for sale at retail and whenever a wholesaler sells or distributes a controlled substance in a package prepared by him or her, the manufacturer shall securely affix to each individual package in which that controlled substance is contained a label showing in legible English the name and address of the vendor and the quantity, kind, and form of controlled substance contained in it. No person, except an apothecary for the purpose of filling a prescription under this chapter, shall alter, deface, or remove any label so affixed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1975, ch. 268, § 1.

21-28-3.27.
Labeling by dispensing apothecaries.

Whenever an apothecary sells or dispenses any controlled substance on a prescription issued by a practitioner, he or she shall affix to the container in which the controlled substance is sold or dispensed, a label showing his or her own name and address, or the name, and address of the apothecary for whom he or she is lawfully acting; the label shall be printed, typed, or a combination of printed and typed, but shall not be hand written; the name and address of the patient, or, if the patient is an animal, the name and address of the owner of the animal and the species of the animal; the name of the practitioner by whom the prescription was written or ordered; the number of pills dispensed, and any directions that may be stated on the prescription. No person shall alter, deface, or remove any label so affixed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 310, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 143, § 1.

21-28-3.28.
Security requirements generally.

Security requirements for controlled substances shall be the same as those enumerated in federal law; provided, that the director of health may promulgate additional rules and regulations as required to prevent diversion of controlled substances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.29.
Repealed.

21-28-3.30.
Persons exempt from restrictions on possession of controlled substances.

The provisions of this chapter restricting the possession and having control of controlled substances shall not apply to:

Common carriers or to warehouse operators while engaged in lawfully transporting or storing controlled substances, or to any employee of them acting within the scope of his or her employment;

Public officers or their employees in the performance of their official duties requiring possession or control of controlled substances;

Temporary incidental possession by employees or agents of persons lawfully entitled to possession, or by persons whose possession is for the purpose of aiding public officers in performing their official duties, or emergency medical personnel in the performance of their official duties; or

Persons lawfully in possession or control by reason of a proper order, prescription, license, or registration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 434, § 1.

21-28-3.31.
Use of imitation controlled substance in research — Immunity.

No civil or criminal liability shall be imposed by virtue of this chapter on any practitioner, apothecary, or other person registered under this chapter who manufactures, distributes, or possesses an imitation controlled substance for use as a placebo by a registered practitioner in the course of professional practice or research.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 151, § 2.

21-28-3.32.
Electronic prescription database. [Effective until January 1, 2023.]

The information contained in any prescription-drug-monitoring database maintained by the department of health pursuant to §

21-28-3.18

shall be disclosed only:

To a practitioner who certifies that the requested information is for the purpose of evaluating the need for, or providing medical treatment to, a current patient to whom the practitioner is prescribing or considering prescribing a controlled substance;

To a pharmacist who certifies that the requested information is for a current client to whom the pharmacist is dispensing, or considering dispensing, a controlled substance;

To an authorized designee of the practitioner and/or pharmacist to consult the prescription-drug-monitoring database on the practitioner’s and/or pharmacist’s behalf, or to a medical director of the practitioner’s practice for quality improvement activities within the practice, provided that:

The designee so authorized is employed by the same professional practice or pharmacy;

The practitioner or pharmacist takes reasonable steps to ensure that the designee is sufficiently competent in the use of the database;

The practitioner or pharmacist remains responsible for ensuring that access to the database by the designee is limited to authorized purposes as provided for in subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2);

The practitioner or pharmacist remains responsible for ensuring access to the database by the designee occurs in a manner that protects the confidentiality of information obtained from the database and remains responsible for any breach of confidentiality;

The practitioner or pharmacist terminates the designee’s access to the database at the termination of the designee’s employment; and

The ultimate decision as to whether or not to prescribe or dispense a controlled substance remains with the practitioner or pharmacist and is reasonably informed by the relevant, controlled-substance history information obtained from the database;

Pursuant to a valid search warrant based on probable cause to believe a violation of federal or state criminal law has occurred and that specified information contained in the database would assist in the investigation of the crime;

By a department employee to a certified law enforcement prescription drug diversion investigator of a qualified law enforcement agency for use in an investigation.

A certified law enforcement prescription drug diversion investigator shall provide to the department the following information in order to receive information from the database:

The identification credentials assigned by the department; and

The case number of the investigation.

A qualified law enforcement agency shall submit to the department quarterly reports of the data received by all certified law enforcement prescription drug diversion investigators in the qualified law enforcement agency, including, without limitation:

Written verification that the inquiries were part of a lawful prescription drug diversion investigation as provided to the department through the case number of the investigation; and

A brief description of each case closed during that quarter for which the qualified law enforcement agency used information from the database; and

The disposition of the investigation.

The department shall:

Create a verification form for use under subsection (a)(5)(ii)(A) of this section; and

Make the verification form available annually to the qualified law enforcement agency.

The verification form under subsection (a)(5)(ii)(A) of this section shall be submitted to the department within thirty (30) days of receipt of the form by the qualified law enforcement agency.

Failure to submit a verification form under subsection (a)(5)(iv) of this section shall result in the immediate suspension of disclosure of information from the database by the department to the qualified law enforcement agency and its certified law enforcement prescription drug diversion investigators until a determination is made by the department to allow continued disclosure.

The director shall, beginning January 1, 2018, and annually thereafter, review disclosure of information pursuant to subsection (a)(5) of this section. Thereafter, the disclosure of information pursuant to subsection (a)(5) of this section shall automatically renew for successive one-year terms unless the director provides written notice to:

The qualified law enforcement agencies; and

The speaker of the house and the president of the senate, at least sixty (60) days in advance of the then-existing term’s end, that the department wishes to discontinue providing information from the database pursuant to this subsection. The director may reinstitute disclosure by providing written notice to the same parties;

To a patient who requests his or her own prescription information, or the parent or legal guardian of a minor child who requests the minor child’s prescription information;

To a health professional regulatory board that documents, in writing, that the requested information is necessary for an investigation related to licensure, renewal, or disciplinary action involving the applicant, licensee, or registrant to whom the requested information pertains;

To any vendor or contractor with whom the department has contracted, pursuant to state purchasing law and regulations in the contracting of vendors, to establish or maintain the electronic system of the prescription-drug-monitoring database;

To public or private entities for statistical, research, or educational purposes, after removing the patient and prescriber information that could be used to identify individual patients. This shall not include entities receiving a waiver from the institutional review board; or

To any vendor, agent, contractor, or designee who or that operates an electronic health record or clinical-management system for the purpose of sharing data with practitioners, pharmacists, or licensed healthcare facilities or designees.

Information stored in the prescription-drug-monitoring database shall include only the following:

Patient’s first and last name and/or patient identification number; provided, however, the patient’s social security number shall not be recorded in whole or in part, patient sex, patient date of birth, and patient address;

Prescribing practitioner’s name and Drug Enforcement Administration prescriber-information number;

Prescribing practitioner’s office or hospital contact information;

Prescription name, prescription number, prescription species code, national drug code number, prescription dosage, prescription quantity, days’ supply, new-refill code, number of refills authorized, date the prescription was written, date the prescription was filled, payment type; provided, however, no credit card number shall be recorded in whole or in part; and

The Drug Enforcement Administration pharmacy number of the pharmacy filling the prescription.

The department shall disclose any information relating to a patient maintained in the prescription-drug-monitoring database to that patient, at no cost to the patient, within thirty (30) business days after the department receives a written request from the patient for the information. This information shall include the records maintained by the department pursuant to subsection (e). Notwithstanding the above, the department may, at the request of the law enforcement agency, withhold, for up to sixty (60) days following the conclusion of a law enforcement investigation that has been confirmed by the department, the disclosure to the patient that information has been obtained pursuant to subsections (a)(4) and (a)(5) of this section.

A patient may request, from the dispensing pharmacy, correction of any inaccurate information contained within the prescription-drug-monitoring database in accordance with the procedure specified by §

5-37.3-5(c)

.

The department shall, for the period of time that prescription information is maintained, maintain records of the information disclosed through the prescription-drug-monitoring database, including, but not limited to:

The identity of each person who requests or receives information from the prescription-drug-monitoring database and the organization, if any, the person represents;

The information released to each person or organization and the basis for its release under subsection (a); and

The dates the information was requested and provided.

Prescription information contained within the prescription-drug-monitoring database shall be removed no later than five (5) years from the date the information is entered into the database. Records in existence prior to the enactment of this section shall be removed no later than ten (10) years from the date the information is entered into the database.

The department shall promptly notify any affected individual of an improper disclosure of information from the prescription-drug-monitoring database or a breach in the security of the prescription-drug-monitoring database that poses a significant risk of disclosure of patient information to an unauthorized individual.

At the time of signing a prescription that is required by the department to be entered into the prescription-drug-monitoring database, the prescribing practitioner shall inform the patient in writing of the existence of the prescription-drug-monitoring database; the patient’s right to access his or her own prescription information; and the name and contact information of the agency operating the program.

No person shall access information in the prescription-monitoring-database except to the extent and for the purposes authorized by subsection (a).

In any civil action allowing a violation of this chapter, the court may award damages, including punitive damages, and reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff, and injunctive and any other appropriate relief.

Any pharmacist who, in his or her professional judgment, refuses to fill a prescription based on information contained within the prescription-drug-monitoring database shall inform the prescribing physician within twenty-four (24) hours.

All practitioners shall, as a condition of the initial registration or renewal of the practitioner’s authority to prescribe controlled substances, register with the prescription-drug-monitoring database maintained by the department of health.

The prescription-monitoring program shall be reviewed prior to starting any opioid. A prescribing practitioner, or designee as authorized by subsection (a)(3) of this section, shall review the prescription-monitoring program prior to refilling or initiating opioid therapy with an intrathecal pump. For patients the prescribing practitioner is maintaining on continuous opioid therapy for pain for three (3) months or longer, the prescribing practitioner shall review information from the prescription-monitoring program at least every three (3) months. Documentation of that review shall be noted in the patient’s medical record.

The department shall improve the usefulness and value of the prescription-drug-monitoring database program by increasing its analytical functionality, timeliness, and scope, such as by:

Utilizing data from additional data sources as permissible under state and federal statutes;

Analyzing information submitted to the prescription-drug-monitoring database to ensure that prescription data collected from dispensing pharmacists is readily accessible for a given patient; to identify unusual or aberrant patterns of prescribing, dispensing, or receiving controlled substances; and to generate an automatic alert when such patterns arise to automate standard reports; and to provide ad hoc reports on a real-time basis on this data as well as other data feeds. These reports shall comply with the patient confidentiality requirements of federal and state law;

Developing regulations to ensure that prescription-drug-monitoring analyses are updated and disseminated regularly to appropriate officials and that summary reports are provided to the general assembly on or before February 1 of each year. Given the intent to decrease the number of Rhode Island citizens affected by opioid use, the department shall provide an interim report on the status of the directives included herein and any progress made as of October 1, 2016. In the development of the regulations, the department may include any of the following analytical functions, within the boundaries of patient confidentiality rights under state and federal law:

Consolidate raw prescription data collected from dispensing pharmacists into a single view of all prescriptions filled for a given patient;

Identify unusual or aberrant patterns of prescribing controlled substances, by relevant prescriber attributes, and generate an automatic alert when these patterns arise;

Identify unusual or aberrant patterns of receiving prescriptions for controlled substances, by relevant patient attributes, and generate an automatic alert when these patterns arise;

Identify unusual or aberrant patterns of dispensing controlled substances, by relevant dispenser attributes, and generate an automatic alert when these patterns arise;

Identify and visually display linkages among prescribers, patients, and dispensers that can be used to detect any collusive behaviors; and

The department shall apply for federal funding in support of the goals and objectives contained in this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 124, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 132, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 351, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 464, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 90, § 1, effective June 25, 2021.